en: pork offal
hr: svinjske iznutrice
it: frattaglie di maiale
pl: podroby wieprzowe

en: smoked bacon
bg: пушен бекон
ca: cansalada fumada
de: geräucherter Speck
es: Tocino ahumado
fi: savupekoni, savustettu pekoni
fr: lard fumé
hr: dimljena slanina
hu: füstölt bacon, füstölt bacon szalonna
it: pancetta affumicata
nl: gerookte spek, gerookt spek
sv: rökt bacon

en: lardon, lardoon
br: lardez
de: Speckwürfel, Speckstreifen
es: mechar, mechas de tocino
fr: lardons, lardons supérieurs
he: לארדון
hr: šunka kockice
it: Lardo
ja: ラードン
nl: spekjes, spekreepjes
uk: Шпиковање меса

en: smoked lardoons
de: geräucherte Speckwürfel
es: mechas de tocino ahumadas
fr: lardon fumé, lardons fumés
hr: dimljeni lonci
it: lardo affumicato, Lardi affumicati
nl: gerookte spekjes
pt: toucinho fumado

en: cooked lardoons
de: gekochte Speckwürfel
es: mechas de tocino cocidas
fr: lardons cuits
hr: kuhane masnice
it: lardo cotto
pt: toucinho cozido

en: smoked cooked lardoons
ca: cansalada fumat fregit
de: Speckwürfel gekocht und geräuchert
es: tocino ahumado frito
fr: lardons cuits fumés, lardons cuits fumés rissolés
hr: dimljeni kuhani lardoons
it: lardo cotto affumicato
pt: toucinho cozido fumado

fr: rognons de porc
bg: свински бъбреци
ca: ronyons de porc
de: Schweinenieren
es: riñones de cerdo
fi: sian munuaiset
hu: sertésvese
it: reni di maiale
nl: varkensnieren
pt: rins de porco

fr: jarret avant de porc
ca: cama de porc
de: Schweinevorderhaxe
es: pierna de cerdo
fi: sian etujalka
hu: sertéslábszár
it: coscia di maiale
nl: varkensschenkel
pt: perna de porco

fr: pièces de tête de porc, morceaux de tête de porc
ca: cap de porc
es: cabeza de cerdo

en: pork tongue
bg: свински език
ca: llengua de por
de: Schweinezunge
es: lengua de cerdo
fi: sian kieli
fr: langue de porc
hr: svinjski jezik
hu: sertésnyelv, disznónyelv
it: lingua di maiale
nl: varkenstong
pt: língua de porco

en: Pork chops
ca: costelles de porc
es: costillas de cerdo
fr: Côtes de porc
hr: svinjski odresci
it: costolette di maiale
sv: sida av gris

en: Grilled pork chop
fr: Côte de porc grillée
hr: svinjski kotlet na žaru
it: costoletta di maiale alla griglia

en: Pork spare-ribs
fr: Travers de porc
hr: svinjska rebra
pl: żeberka wieprzowe

en: boston butt, pork rack
de: schweinekamm
fi: sianniska
fr: carré de porc, carré
hr: bostonska guza
it: capocollo
ko: 목살
pl: karkówka, karkówka wieprzowa
ru: шея
sk: krkovička
sv: karré, fläskkarré
zh: 上肩肉

en: Cooked pork rack
fr: Carré de porc cuit
hr: kuhana svinjska rešetka
it: carré di maiale cotto

en: Pork filet mignon
fr: filet mignon de porc
hr: svinjski file mignon
it: filetto mignon di maiale

en: Cooked pork filet mignon
fr: Filet mignon de porc cuit
hr: kuhani svinjski file mignon
it: filetto mignon di maiale cotto

fr: viande de porc cuite
ca: porc cuit
es: cerdo cocido

fr: viande de porc traitée en salaison
ca: porc curat
es: cerdo curado

en: Cooked pork roast
fr: Rôti de porc cuit
hr: kuhano svinjsko pečenje
it: arrosto di maiale cotto